District of Columbia statutes.
29-607.04

Statement of dissociation.

(a)

A dissociated partner or the partnership may file a statement of dissociation stating the name of the partnership and that the partner is dissociated from the partnership.

(b)

A statement of dissociation shall be a limitation on the authority of a dissociated partner for the purposes of § 29-603.03(d) and (e).

(c)

For the purposes of §§ 29-607.02(a)(3) and 29-607.03(b)(3), a person not a partner shall be deemed to have notice of the dissociation 90 days after the statement of dissociation is filed.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-601.03, § 29-603.03, § 29-607.02, and § 29-607.03.
1981 Ed., § 41-157.4.
2001 Ed., § 33-107.04.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 704 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).